Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 45 Noise Limits for Motor Vehicles

31-45-1.
Noise limits.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle, nor shall the owner of any vehicle allow the vehicle to be operated, at any time, or under any condition of grade, load, acceleration, or deceleration, in such a manner as to exceed the following noise limit based on a distance of fifty feet (50´) from the center of the lane of travel within the speed limit. For the purposes of this section, “dbA” means decibels measured with a calibrated sound level meter weighted to the “A” scale.

In speed zones of thirty-five miles per hour (35 mph) or less, not more than eighty-six (86) dbA. In speed zones of more than thirty-five miles per hour (35 mph), not more than ninety (90) dbA.

Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 126.

31-45-2.
Establishment of regulations.

The director of the department of revenue is authorized to adopt rules, regulations, and procedures to be utilized in the enforcement of this chapter. The director is further authorized to lower the noise standards set forth in this chapter consistent with economic and technological feasibility. The procedure shall allow, to the extent feasible, noise measurement and enforcement action to be accomplished in reasonably confined areas such as residential areas. The adoption of those rules, regulations, and limits shall be pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 28; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 28.

31-45-3.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to the total noise from a vehicle and shall not be construed as limiting or precluding the enforcement of any other provisions of law relating to motor vehicle exhaust noise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 197, § 1.

31-45-4.
Penalty.

Every person convicted of violating this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 134, § 2.

31-45-5.
Motor vehicle radios, stereos and audio systems.

It shall be unlawful for any motor vehicle with a radio, stereo or audio system to produce sound which exceeds those limits specified in this chapter. Police cars, ambulances and fire engines shall not be subject to this section. Local cities and towns may, at their discretion, issue temporary exemption by special permit upon a showing of good cause. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 150, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 126.